South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4462.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.A.  Chapter 1, Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 2-1-260. (A) A member of the South Carolina House of Representatives or the South Carolina Senate may not serve more than twelve years in the General Assembly whether through service in one chamber or a combination of service in both chambers. (B) Service in the General Assembly prior to the effective date of this act must not be considered in calculating the twelve-year limitation. The limitation on years of service applies after the effective date of this act. B. This section takes effect upon ratification of an amendment to Section 7, Article III of the Constitution of this State authorizing the General Assembly to provide term limitations for its members by statute. SECTION 2.  Chapter 1, Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 2-1-270. (A) Effective January 1, 2027, members of the South Carolina House of Representatives shall receive two thousand five hundred dollars per month as part of their in-district compensation. (B) Effective January 1, 2029, members of the South Carolina Senate shall receive two thousand five hundred dollars per month as part of their in-district compensation. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----